dictsource/ta_rules
//sort
   _டே) ட		t.V#
  _மால்) ட		t.V#
 _பேண்) ட		t.V#
 _வால்) ட		t.V#
_கமெண்) ட		t.V#
_க்ளையண்) ட		t.V#
_பேஷண்) ட		t.V#
_ரிப்போர்) ட		t.V#
_வோல்) ட		t.V#
_ஷிஃப்) ட		t.V#
அL04ால்) ட		t.V#
அக்ரீமெண்) ட		t.V#
அர்ஜண்) ட		t.V#
அர்ஜெண்) ட		t.V#
இண்டர்மீடியே) ட		t.V#
ன்ஸ்பரண்) ட		t.V#
ன்ஸ்பெரண்) ட		t.V#
     _) ட (ஃப்		t.V
     _) ட (க்_		t.V
     _) ட (க்கர		t.V
     _) ட (க்கு		t.V
     _) ட (க்கெ		t.V
     _) ட (க்ன		t.V
     _) ட (ச்_L34	t.V
     _) டச்சப்		t.VtS:Vp
     _) ட (ச்சா		t.V
     _) ட (ச்சிங்		t.V
    ங்) ட (ன		t.V	// -ington
  _நியூ) ட (ன		t.V
  _மில்) ட (ன		t.V
     _) ட (னல		t.V
     _) ட (ன்		t.V
     _) ட (ப்_		t.V
     _) டப்ப (ில	t.Vbb
     _) ட (ப்பெ		t.V
    _) ட (ம்ப்லர		t.V
     _) ட (ம்ப்ளர	t.V
     _) ட (ம்ளர		t.V
     _) ட (யத்த		t.V
     _) ட (யம		t.V
     _) ட (யரில		t.V
    _) ட (யரு		t.V
     _) ட (யரை		t.V
     _) ட (யரோ		t.V
     _) ட (யர்		t.V
  ஃபில்) ட (ர		t.V
 _செண்) ட (ர		t.V
 _ப்ரிண்) ட (ர		t.V
 _ஷெல்) ட (ர		t.V
 _ஸ்கூ) ட (ர		t.V
என்கவுண்) ட (ர		t.V
என்கௌண்) ட (ர		t.V
   சானி) ட (ரி		t.V
  _மில) ட (ரி		t.V
  _மிலி) ட (ரி		t.V
  இண்) ட (ர்		t.V
     _) டர்பண்ட (ைன	t.VrpVn.t.
   எண்) டர்பி (ரைL04		t.Vrp
     _) ட (ர்பைன	t.V
 _மெண்) ட (ல		t.V
    அ) ட (ல்		t.V
     _) ட (வர		t.V
     _) ட (வல		t.V
     _) ட (வுன		t.V
     _) ட (வுன்லோட	d.V
  ஸ்டே) ட (ஸ		t.V
   அல்) ட (ா		t.
   உல்) ட (ா		t.
  _மால்) ட (ா		t.
 _டெல்) ட (ா		t.
     _) டாக் (_		t.a:k
     _) ட (ாக்க		t.  // talkies
     _) டாக்குமெண்ட	d.a:kkUmen.t.V#
     _) ட (ாக்சி		t.
     _) டாக்ட (ர	d.a:kt.V
     _) டாக (்ஸி		t.a:k
     _) டாங்க (ர		t.a:NkV
     _) டாங்க (ி		t.a:Nk
     _) டாட (ா		t.a:t.
     _) ட (ாட்ட		t.
     _) ட (ாண்		t.
     _) டானிக்		t.a:nik
     _) ட (ான்சானிய	t.
     _) ட (ான்ஜானிய	t.
     _) டாபிக்		t.a:pik
     _) டாப்		t.a:p
     _) ட (ாமி_		t.
     _) ட (ாமிய		t.
     _) டாய்லட்		t.a:jlVt.
     _) டாய்லெட்		t.a:jlet.
     _) ட (ார்ச்சர		t.
  அண்) டார்டிக		t.a:rt.ikV#
     _) ட (ாலமி		t.
     _) ட (ால்ஸ்டாய	t.
   புல்_) ட (ாஸ		t.
  பெண்) டாஸ்டிக்		t.a:st.ik
     _) ட (ாஸ்மாக்	t.
  _டியூ) ட (ி		t.
  _ட்யூ) ட (ி		t.
 _சேஃப்) ட (ி		t.
 _பேண்) ட (ி		t.
 _ராயல்) ட (ி		t.
_க்வாலி) ட (ி		t.
_நாவல்) ட (ி		t.
     _) டி(ரையல	t.
     _) ட (ிஃபன	t.
 _போர்) ட (ிகோ		t.
   ஆர்) டிக்		t.ik
     _) டிக்கட்		t.ikkVt.
     _) டிக்கெட்		t.ikket.
     _) டிட (ோ		t.it.
  _மார்) ட (ின		t.
  காண்) டினெண்ட (ல	t.inen.t.V
  கான்) டினென்ட (ல 	t.inent.V
     _) ட (ின்		t.
     _) டின்க (ரிங்	t.inkV
     _) ட (ின்னர	d.
     _) டிப (ன		t.ifV
   _சர்) டிபிகேட		t.ifige:t.V#
     _) ட (ிப்ஸ		t.
 _செண்) ட (ிமீட்ட	t.
_செண்) டிமெண்ட		t.imen.t.V#
     _) ட (ிம்பர		t.
     _) டி (யூசன	t.
     _) டியூட (ி	d.jU:t.
     _) டி (யூன	t.
     _) டி (யூப	t.
     _) டி (யூஷன	t.
  _ராஷ்) டி (ர		t.
 இராஷ்) டி (ர		t.
_மL06ாராஷ்) டி (ர		t.
     _) டிரக்		t.rVk
     _) டி (ரங்		t.
     _) டி (ரங்கு	t.
   ராஷ்) டி (ரபதி	t.
     _) டி (ரபிள	t.
     _) டி (ரம		d.
     _) டிரம்பெட்	t.rVmpet.
     _) டி (ரயல		t.
     _) டிர (ஸ		d.re
     _) டிர (ஸ்ட	t.rV
     _) டி (ரா_		d.
     _) டிராஃபிக்	t.ra:fik
     _) டி (ராகுலா	d.
     _) டிராக்		t.ra:k
 _காண்) டி (ராக்டர	t.
     _) டி (ராஜ		t.
     _) டி (ரான்சிஸ்டர	t.
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்ஃபர	t.
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்ப	t.
     _) டிரான்ஸ்ப (ர	t.ra:nsfV
     _) டிரான் (ஸ்பரண்ட+++	t.ra:n
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்மீட்டர	t.
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்லே	t.
     _) டி (ரான்ஸ்வேல	t.
     _) டிராப (ி_	t.ra:f
     _) டிராப (ிகள	t.ra:f
     _) டிராபிக்		t.ra:fik
     _) டிராப (ிய	t.ra:f
     _) டிராப்		t.ra:p
     _) டி (ராமா	d.
     _) டி (ராமில	t.
     _) டி (ராமை	t.
     _) டி (ராம்		t.
     _) டி (ராய		d.
     _) டி (ராயிங்	d.
கொலஸ்) டி (ரால		_|t.
     _) டி (ராலி	t.
     _) டி (ராவ		d.
     _) டி (ராவல	t.
     _) டி (ராவெல	t.
     _) டிரிக (ர		t.riggV
     _) டிரிக்		t.rik
     _) டிரிக்க (ர	t.riggV
     _) டி (ரிங்_	t.
     _) டி (ரிங்க்	d.
     _) டி (ரிங்ஸ	d.
     _) டி (ரினிடாட	t.
     _) டிரினிட (ி	t.rinit.
     _) டிரிப்		t.rip
     _) டி (ரிம்		t.
     _) டி (ரில		d.
     _) டி (ரில்லியன	t.
     _) டிரீட்		t.ri:t.
     _) டி (ரெண்	t.
     _) டிரெயி(லர	t.rej
     _) டி (ரெயின	t.
     _) டி (ரெய்ன	t.
     _) டி (ரெய்லர	t.
     _) டி (ரெஸ	d.
   இண்) டி (ரெஸ்ட	t.
     _) டி (ரே		t.
     _) டிரேயின (ை	t.re:jn
     _) டி (ரை_		d.
     _) டி (ரை_செஞ்ச	t.
     _) டி (ரை_செய்	t.
     _) டி (ரை_பண்	t.
   _ஸ்) டி (ரைக்		t.
     _) டி (ரைலர	t.
     _) டி (ரைவ	d.
   கண்) டி (ரோல	t.
 _ஜெண்) ட (ில		t.
 _கௌ) ட (ில்ய		t.
  _நெக) ட (ிவ		t.
     _) ட (ிவிக		t.
     _) டிவிங்க (ிள	t.wiNk
     _) டிவ (ிட்டர	t.w
     _) ட (ிவிய	t.
     _) ட (ிவில	t.
     _) ட (ிஷ்ய		t.
     _)  டீசண்ட		d.i:sVn.t.V#
     _) ட (ீசல		d.
 _காண்) ட (ீன		t.
 _கேண்) ட (ீன		t.
     _) ட (ீல		d.
     _) டுட (ோரியல	t.ut.
     _) ட (ுனிசியா	t.
     _) ட (ுனிஸ	t.
     _) ட (ுனீL04	t.
     _) ட (ுனீஷிய	t.
     _) டுவிங்க (ிள	t.wiNk
     _) டுவ (ிட்டர	t.w
_பிளஸ்_) டூ		t.u:
_ப்ளஸ்_) டூ		t.u:
     _) ட (ூ_வீல		t.
     _) டூத்		t.u:t
   _கார்) ட (ூன		t.
     _) ட (ூர		t.
     _) ட (ூல		t.
   இண்) ட (ெ		t.
     _) டெக (்சாஸ	t.ek
     _) டெக் (னாலஜி	t.ek
     _) டெக்னிக		t.eknikV#
     _) ட (ெக்ஸாஸ	t.
     _) ட (ெக்ஸ்		t.
     _) ட (ெசோ		t.
     _) ட (ெண்டர	t.
     _) ட (ெண்டுல்கர	t.
     _) டெண்ட்		t.en.t.
     _) டென்ச (ன	t.ens.V
     _) டென்டுல்க (ர	t.ent.UlkV
     _) ட (ென்னிஸ	t.
_டேபிள்_) ட (ென்னிஸ	t.
_லான்_) ட (ென்னிஸ	t.
     _) ட (ென்ஷன	t.
     _) டெம்ப (ர		t.empV
     _) டெம்ப (ோ	t.emp
     _) டெம்ப்லேட்	t.emple:t.
     _) ட (ெய்லர	t.
     _) ட (ெர		t.
     _) டெலஸ்கோப்	t.elVsko:p
     _) ட (ெலிஃபோன	t.
     _) டெலிகீ (ராம	t.elig
     _) டெலிபத (ி	t.elipVt
     _) டெலிபிரிண்ட (ர	t.eliprint.V
	டெலிப (ோன	t.elif
     _) ட (ெலிவிஷன	t.
     _) ட (ெல்_அவீவ	t.  // tel aviv
     _) டெஸ்ட		t.est.V#
 _வெஜி) ட (ே		t.
     _) டேக்		t.e:k
     _) டேங்க (ர		t.e:NkV
     _) ட (ேப		t.
     _) ட (ேஸ்ட		t.
    _) டைட (ில		t.aIt.
     _) டைப (ாய்ட	t.aIf
     _) டைப்		t.aIp
     _) ட (ைம்_		t.
    _ரி) ட (ையர		t.
     _) ட (ைல்ஸ		t.
     _) டொக்		t.ok
     _) ட (ொபாகோ	t.
     _) டொரண்ட (ோ	t.orVn.t.
     _) ட (ோக்கன	t.
     _) ட (ோக்கியோ	t.
     _) ட (ோட்டல	t.
     _) ட (ோன		t.
    ளு) ட (ோனிய	t.
     _) டோரண்ட (ோ	t.o:rVn.t.
  _ப்ரி) ட (ோரிய	t.
     _) டோர்னமெண்ட	t.o:rnVmen.t.V#
     _) ட (ோலிவுட்	t.
   _லே) ட்		t.
   _ஹி) ட்		t.
 @மெண்) ட்		t.     // -ment
 _பேண்) ட்		t.
_ஹெல்மெ) ட்		t.
இண்டர்நெ) ட்		t.
     ல) ட்சு (மண	ks.
     ல) ட்சு (மி		ks.
    _ல) ட்ட		d.d.V#
 _பிரெ) ட்ட		d.d.V#
_கோலிவு) ட்ட		d.d.V#
_டோலிவு) ட்ட		d.d.V#
_பாலிவு) ட்ட		d.d.V#
_மாலிவு) ட்ட		d.d.V#
_ஹாலிவு) ட்ட		d.d.V#
   _ரெ) ட்ட (ிகள	d.d.
   _ரெ) ட்ட (ிய		d.d.
  _ஷெ) ட்ட (ில		d.d.
    இ) ட்ட (ிலி		d.d.
   _ஜி) ட்ட (ு		d.d.
  _ஷெ) ட்ட (ு		d.d.
  _ஷெ) ட்ட (ை		d.d.
அப்பாயிண்) ட்மெண்ட	t.men.t.V#
     _) ட் (யூசன	t.
     _) ட் (யூன		t.
     _) ட் (யூப		t.
    ஸ்) ட் (ர		_|t.  // ?? make t. distinct
  _நை) ட் (ர		t.
     _) ட்ரக்		t.rVk
     _) ட் (ரங்		t.
     _) ட் (ரங்கு		t.
     _) ட் (ரபிள		t.
     _) ட்ரம்பெட்		t.rVmpet.
     _) ட் (ரயல		t.
     _) ட் (ரஸ்ட		t.
    _த) ட் (ரா		t.
    _நீ) ட் (ரா		t.
    ஆ) ட் (ரா		t.
     _) ட்ராஃபிக்		t.ra:fik
     _) ட்ராக்		t.ra:k
    அ) ட்ராக்		t.ra:k
 _காண்) ட் (ராக்டர		t.
     _) ட் (ராஜ		t.
  _நியூ) ட் (ரான	t.
     _) ட (்ரான்சிஸ்டர	t.
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்ஃபர	t.
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்ப	t.
     _) ட்ரான்ஸ்ப (ர	t.ra:nsfV
     _) ட்ரான்ஸ்ப (ரண்ட	t.ra:nspV
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்பாண்டர	t.
     _) ட்ரான்ஸ்பிரண்ட	t.ra:nspirVn.t.V#
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்மீட்டர	t.
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்லே	t.
     _) ட் (ரான்ஸ்வேல	t.
     _) ட்ராப (ி		t.ra:f
     _) ட்ராபிக்		t.ra:fik
     _) ட் (ராமில	t.
     _) ட் (ராமை		t.
     _) ட் (ராம்		t.
     _) ட் (ராலி		t.
     _) ட் (ராவல		t.
     _) ட் (ராவெல	t.
   எண்) ட் (ரி		t.
  _மெ) ட் (ரி		t.
     _) ட்ரிக (ர		t.riggV
     _) ட்ரிக்		t.rik
   _ஹா) ட்ரிக்		t.rik
     _) ட்ரிக்க (ர		t.riggV
     _) ட் (ரிங்_		t.
  _நியூ) ட் (ரின	t.
     _) ட் (ரினிடாட	t.
     _) ட்ரினிட (ி	t.rinit.
     _) ட் (ரிம்		t.
     _) ட் (ரில்லியன	t.
     _) ட்ரீட்		t.ri:t.
    _வி) ட் (ரு		t.
    உ) ட் (ரு		t.
   _கே) ட் (ரு		t.
   _வு) ட் (ரு		t.
  _போ) ட் (ரு		t.
     _) ட் (ரெண்		t.
     _) ட்ரெயி (லர	t.rej
     _) ட் (ரெய்ன	t.
     _) ட் (ரெய்லர	t.
     _) ட் (ரே		t.
  _நை) ட்ரேட்		t.reIt.
   இண்) ட் (ரேஸ்ட	t.
     _) ட் (ரை_செஞ்ச	t.
     _) ட் (ரை_செய்	t.
     _) ட் (ரை_பண்	t.
     _) ட் (ரையல	t.
     _) ட் (ரைலர		t.
   _பெ) ட் (ரோ		t.
  _மெ) ட் (ரோ		t.
   கண்) ட் (ரோல		t.
    _த) ட் (றா		t.
    _நீ) ட் (றா		t.
    ஆ) ட் (றா		t.
    _த) ட் (ல		t.
    _வீ) ட் (ல		t.
    ஊ) ட் (ல		t.
   _கா) ட் (ல		t.
   _கூ) ட் (ல		t.
   _நா) ட் (ல		t.
   _பா) ட் (ல		t.
   _மே) ட் (ல		t.
   _ரூ) ட் (ல		t.
  _நை) ட் (ல		t.
  _நோ) ட் (ல		t.
  _ரை) ட் (ல		t.
  _ரோ) ட் (ல		t.
 _நடுகா) ட் (ல		t.
 _நடுவீ) ட் (ல		t.
_நடுரோ) ட் (ல		t.
_லெஃப்) ட் (ல		t.
    இ) ட் (லர		t.
   _ஹி) ட் (லர		t.
     அ) ட்லாண்ட		t.la:n.t.V#  // atlant
     _) ட்விங்க (ிள	t.wiNk
     _) ட்வ (ிட்டர	t.w
//endsort


.group ண
	ண	n.V
	ண (B	n.


.group த
	த	dV
	த (B	d
     _) த	tV
     _) த (B	t
     _) த (T	dV	// if word has $alt attribute in ta_list
     _) த (BT+	d	// if word has $alt
	த்த	ttV
	த்த (B	tt
    க்) த	tV
    க்) த (B	t
    ஸ்) த	tV
    ஸ்) த (B	t
     ப்) த	tV
     ப்) த (B	t
    ட்)  த	tV
    ட்)  த (B	t
	த் (_த		t

	// exceptions, த as [d]

//sort
